New York, session 2025-2026, A9432.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 318 of the racing, pari-mutuel 2 wagering and breeding law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2025 3 amending the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law relating to 4 welfare, medical, and retirement plans provided by a horsemen's organ- 5 ization in the absence of contractual obligations, as proposed in legis- 6 lative bills numbers S. 2612-B and A. 8206, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in the 9 absence of a contract between the licensed harness racing corporation or 10 association and the representative horsemen's organization, the [state 11 gaming commission shall require such corporation or association to pay 12 to the horsemen's organization an amount determined in accordance with 13 the] previously negotiated contract [for] related to welfare, medical, 14 or retirement plans, including any associated costs, provided by the 15 horsemen's organization to participants in racing at the licensed 16 harness racing facility shall be automatically extended for a one-time 17 period of twelve months commencing from the date that the previously 18 negotiated contract expired. The amounts shall be paid monthly from the 19 horsemen's gross purse enhancement amount from video lottery gaming. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 21 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the racing, pari-mutuel 22 wagering and breeding law relating to welfare, medical, and retirement 23 plans provided by a horsemen's organization in the absence of contractu- 24 al obligations, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 2612-B and 25 A. 8206, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06878-07-6